Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-2305
Board; transitional provisions; vacancy; how filled; term.

The member serving former district 1 will assume the role of serving new district 1 on February 28, 2002, and his or her term shall expire on June 30, 2004. The member serving former district 2 will assume the role of serving new district 2 on February 28, 2002, and his or her term shall expire on June 30, 2003. The term of the member serving district 3 shall expire on June 30, 2002. The term of the member serving district 4 shall expire on June 30, 2006. The term of the member serving district 5 shall expire on June 30, 2005. The member serving former district 6 will assume the role of serving new district 6 on February 28, 2002, and his or her term shall expire on June 30, 2004. The member serving former district 7 will assume the role of serving new district 7 on February 28, 2002, and his or her term shall expire on June 30, 2005. As the terms of office of the members serving on February 28, 2002, expire as provided in this section, their successors shall be appointed to serve for terms of five years and until their successors are appointed and qualified. Terms of office shall commence on July 1. A member appointed to fill a vacancy, occurring before the expiration of the term of a member separated from the board for any cause, shall be appointed for the remainder of the term of the member whose office has been so vacated in the same manner as his or her predecessor.

Laws 1955, c. 5, § 5, p. 61;

Laws 1969, c. 21, § 2, p. 194;

Laws 1981, LB 11, § 24;

Laws 1991, LB 685, § 2;

Laws 2002, LB 474, § 2.